apertium-moe.moe.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for moe

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   	! Noun
%<vblex%> 	! Verb
%<ij%>		! Interjection
%<prn%>		! Pronoun
%<adv%>		! Adverb
%<cnjcoo%>	! Coordinating Conjunction

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  	! Plural
%<sg%>  	! Singular
%<inc%>		! Inclusive
%<exc%>		! Exclusive

! Possession morphology
%<px1sg%> 	! 1st person singular possessor
%<px2sg%>	! 2nd person singular possessor
%<px3sg%> 	! 3rd person singular possessor
%<px3obv%>	! 3rd person obviative possessor
%<px1plex%>	! 1st person plural exclusive possessor
%<px1plin%>	! 1st person plural inclusive posssessor
%<px2pl%>	! 2nd person plural possessor
%<px3pl%>	! 3rd person plural possessor
%<pxindef%>	! Indefinite possessor

! Gender
%<aa%> ! Animate
%<nn%> ! Inanimate

! Noun morphology
%<obv%> ! Obviative
%<loc%> ! Locative

! Verb Categories
%<iv%> ! Intransitive
%<tv%> ! Transitive

! Person Morphology
%<p1%> ! 1st person
%<p2%> ! 2nd person
%<p3%> ! 3rd person

! Object Morphology
%<obj1sg%>	! First person singular object
%<obj1plex%>	! First person plural exclusive object
%<obj1plin%>	! First person plural inclusive object
%<obj2sg%>	! Second person singular object
%<obj2pl%>	! Second person plural object
%<obj2%>	! Second person object (indeterminate number) NOTE: Check to make sure this is how this really works
%<obj3sg%>	! Third person object
%<obj3pl%>	! Third person plural object
%<obj3obv%>	! Obviative object

! Pronoun Categories
%<dem%> ! Demonstrative
%<prx%>	! Proximal
%<med%> ! Medial
%<mdst%> ! Medio-distal
%<dst%> ! Distal
%<foc%> ! Focus
%<itg%> ! Interrogative

! Punctuation
%<sent%>	! Sentence
%<cm%>		! Comma
%<quot%>	! Quote introducer (dash)
%<lquot%>	! Left quote
%<rquot%>	! Right quote
%<lpar%>	! Left parenthesis
%<rpar%>	! Right parenthesis

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary

! Archiphonemes
%{ᵘ%}
%{t%}
%{i%}
%{u%}
%{S%}
%{h%}
%{U%}
%{z%}
%{n%}
%{e%}
%{a%}
%{A%}

! "Prefix" symbols
%[%+p1%]
%[%-p1%]
%[%+p2%]
%[%-p2%]
%[%+p3%]
%[%-p3%]
%[%-pindef%]
%[%-pindef%]
%[%-nn%]
%[%+nn%]
%[%+aa%]
%[%-aa%]
%[%-poss%]
%[%+poss%]



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounPrefixes ;
VerbPrefixes ;
MiscRoot ;
PronounRoot ;
AdvRoot ;
Punctuation ;


LEXICON NounPrefixes

NounRoot ;
%[%-p1%]%[%-poss%]:n%{i%}%{t%}%> NounRoot ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-poss%]:tsh%{i%}%{t%}%> NounRoot ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-poss%]:%{u%}%{t%}%> NounRoot ;
%[%-p1%]%[%-poss%]:n%{i%}%{t%}%> DepRoot ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-poss%]:tsh%{i%}%{t%}%> DepRoot ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-poss%]:%{u%}%{t%}%> DepRoot ;
%[%-pindef%]%[%-poss%]:m%{i%}%{t%} DepRoot ;


LEXICON AnimNoun

%[%-aa%]%<n%>%<aa%>:0 PossInfl ;


LEXICON InanimNoun

%[%-nn%]%<n%>%<nn%>:0 PossInfl ;


LEXICON MpossInanim

%[%-nn%]%<%n%>%<nn%>:0 NounInfl ;
%[%-nn%]%[%+poss%]%<%n%>%<nn%>:%>%{i%}m PossInfl ;


LEXICON MpossAnim

%[%-aa%]%<%n%>%<aa%>:0 NounInfl ;
%[%-aa%]%[%+poss%]%<%n%>%<aa%>:%>%{i%}m PossInfl ;


LEXICON PossInfl

NounInfl ;
%[%+p1%]%<px1sg%>:0 NounInfl ;
%[%+p2%]%<px2sg%>:0 NounInfl ;
%[%+p3%]%<px3sg%>:0 NounInfl ;
%[%+p1%]%<px1plex%>:%>%{i%}nan NounInfl ;
%[%+p2%]%<px1plin%>:%>%{i%}nan NounInfl ;
%[%+p2%]%<px2pl%>:%>uau NounInfl ;
%[%+p3%]%<px3pl%>:%>uau NounInfl ;
%[%+p3%]%<px3obv%>:%>%{i%}nu NounInfl ;


LEXICON NounInfl

%<sg%>:0 # ;
%[%+aa%]%<pl%>:%>at # ;
%[%+aa%]%<obv%>:%>a # ;
%[%+nn%]%<pl%>:%>a # ;
%[%+nn%]%<obv%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}nu # ;
%<loc%>:%>%{i%}t # ;


LEXICON VerbPrefixes

%[%-p1%]:n%{i%}%{t%}%> VerbRoot ;
%[%-p2%]:tsh%{i%}%{t%}%> VerbRoot ;
%[%-p3%]:0 VerbRoot ;


LEXICON AnimIntr

%[%-aa%]%<vblex%>%<iv%>%<aa%>:0 IntrInfl ;


LEXICON InanimIntr

%[%-nn%]%<vblex%>%<iv%>%<nn%>:0 IntrInfl ;


LEXICON IntrInfl

%[%+p1%]%[%+aa%]%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{n%} # ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+aa%]%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{n%} # ;
%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{u%} # ;
%[%+p1%]%[%+aa%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<exc%>:%>nan # ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+aa%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<inc%>:%>nan # ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+aa%]%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>nau # ;
%[%+aa%]%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{u%}at # ;
%[%+aa%]%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<obv%>:%>nua # ;
%[%+nn%]%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<obv%>%<sg%>:%>nu # ;
%[%+nn%]%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>ua # ;
%[%+nn%]%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<obv%>%<pl%>:%>nua # ;


LEXICON TransInanimObj

%<vblex%>%<tv%>: TransInfl ;


LEXICON TransInfl

%[%+p1%]%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{e%}n # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{e%}n # ;
%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}mᵘ # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<exc%>:%>%{e%}nan # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<inc%>:%>%{e%}nan # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{e%}nau # ;
%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}muat # ;
%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<obv%>:%>%{a%}minua # ;


LEXICON TransAnimObj

%<vblex%>%<tv%>: TransAnimInfl ;


LEXICON TransAnimInfl

%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<sg%>%<obj1sg%>:%>%{z%}%{i%}n # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<pl%>%<obj1sg%>:%>%{z%}%{i%}nau # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<obj1plex%>:%>%{z%}{i%}nan # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p1%>%<sg%>%<obj2sg%>:%>%{i%}tin # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p1%>%<sg%>%<obj2pl%>:%>%{i%}tinau # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<exc%>%<obj2%>:%>%{i%}tinan # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p1%>%<sg%>%<obj3sg%>:%>au # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<sg%>%<obj3sg%>:%>au # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<exc%>%<obj3sg%>:%>anan # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<inc%>%<obj3sg%>:%>anan # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<pl%>%<obj3sg%>:%>auau # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p1%>%<sg%>%<obj3pl%>:%>auat # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<sg%>%<obj3pl%>:%>auat # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<exc%>%<obj3pl%>:%>ananat # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<inc%>%<obj3at%>:%>ananat # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<pl%>%<obj3pl%>:%>auauat # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p3%>%<sg%>%<obj1sg%>:%>%{i%}kᵘ # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p3%>%<sg%>%<obj2sg%>:%>%{i%}kᵘ # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p3%>%<sg%>%<obj1plexc%>:%>%{i%}kunan # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p3%>%<sg%>%<obj1plinc%>:%>%{i%}kunan # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p3%>%<sg%>%<obj2pl%>:%>%{i%}kuau # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p3%>%<pl%>%<obj1sg%>:%>%{i%}kuat # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p3%>%<pl%>%<obj2sg%>:%>%{i%}kuat # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p3%>%<pl%>%<obj1plexc%>:%>%{i%}kunanat # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p3%>%<pl%>%<obj1plinc%>:%>%{i%}kunanat # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p3%>%<pl%>%<obj2pl%>:%>%{i%}kuauat # ;
%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<sg%>%<obj3obv%>:%>eu # ;
%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<pl%>%<obj3obv%>:%>euat # ;
%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<obv%>%<obj3sg%>:%>%{i%}ku # ;
%[%+p3%]%<p3%>%<obv%>%<obj3pl%>:%>%{i%}kuat # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p1%>%<sg%>%<obj3obv%>:%>%{i%}maua # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<sg%>%<obj3obv%>:%>%{i%}maua # ;
%[%+p1%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<exc%>%<obj3obv%>:%>%{i%}manana # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p1%>%<pl%>%<inc%>%<obj3obv%>:%>%{i%}manana # ;
%[%+p2%]%<p2%>%<pl%>%<obj3obv%>:%>%{i%}mauaua # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounRoot

atimᵘ:atim%{ᵘ%} AnimNoun ; ! "dog"
%[%+poss%]atimᵘ:em AnimNoun ; ! "dog" (possessed form)
putai:puta%{i%} MpossInanim ; ! "bottle"
anik:anik AnimNoun ; ! "toad"
ashtish:ashtish AnimNoun ; ! "mitten/glove"
maikan:maikan AnimNoun ; ! "wolf"
innasht:innasht AnimNoun ; ! "fir tree"
atikᵘ:atik%{ᵘ%} AnimNoun ; ! "caribou"
ishkueu:ishkueu MpossAnim ; ! "woman"
utshimau:utshimau MpossAnim ; ! "chief/boss/director/Mister/hockey goalie"
apui:apui AnimNoun ; ! "paddle/propeller"
massin:massin InanimNoun ; ! "shoe"
akup:akup InanimNoun ; ! "coat/jacket/dress"
akupiss:akupiss InanimNoun ; ! "jacket or dress for a baby"
utenau:utena%{u%} MpossInanim ; ! "town"
ush:u%{z%}%{S%}%{h%} InanimNoun ; ! "canoe/boat"
miush:miu%{S%}%{h%} InanimNoun ; ! "box/container"
ishkuteu-ush:ishkuteu-u%{S%}%{h%} InanimNoun ; ! "motorboat/steamship"
aiamieun:aiamieun InanimNoun ; ! "prayer/religion"
anushkan:anushkan AnimNoun ; ! "raspberry"
ishkuess:ishkuess AnimNoun ; ! "girl"
amishkᵘ:amishk%{ᵘ%} AnimNoun ; ! "beaver"
assikᵘ:assik%{ᵘ%} InanimNoun ; ! "pail/pot, canoe motor"
mishtikᵘ:mishtik%{ᵘ%} AnimNoun ; ! "tree"
mishtikᵘ:mishtik%{ᵘ%} InanimNoun ; ! "stick/log"
utukai:utuka%{i%} InanimNoun ; ! "ear (independent), apricot"
nekau:neka%{u%} InanimNoun ; ! "sand"
utei:utei InanimNoun ; ! "heart (independent)"
mei:mei InanimNoun ; ! "turd"
uau:uau InanimNoun ; ! "egg"
minapui:minapu%{i%} MpossInanim ; ! "jam"
nipishapui:nipishapu%{i%} InanimNoun ; ! "tea"
utshu:utsh%{U%} InanimNoun ; ! "mountain"
shipu:ship%{U%} InanimNoun ; ! "river"
mashkushu:mashkush%{U%} InanimNoun ; ! "blade of grass, fern"
mitshuap:mitshuap InanimNoun ; ! "house"
pimi:pimi MpossInanim ; ! "grease/oil"
pishimᵘ:pishim%{ᵘ%} AnimNoun ; ! "sun/moon/month"
utapan:utapan InanimNoun ; ! "vehicle"
unakan:u%{z%}nakan InanimNoun ; ! "bowl/dish/cup"
nekautu:nekautu MpossAnim ; ! "cake"
uapush:uapush MpossAnim ; ! "rabbit" Possession status uncertain
umatshashkukᵘ:umatshashkukᵘ MpossAnim ; ! "frog" Possession status uncertain
innu:innu MpossAnim  ! "human, Innu" Possession status uncertain


LEXICON DepRoot

titshi:titshi InanimNoun ; ! "hand"
anish:anish AnimNoun ; ! "daughter"
shim:shim AnimNoun ; ! "sibling, cousin"
shtesh:shtesh AnimNoun ; ! "brother, male cousin"


LEXICON VerbRoot 

nipa AnimIntr ; ! "sleep"
pashte:pashte InanimIntr ; ! "be dry"
pash:pash TransInanimObj ; ! "dry"
itakan:itakan AnimIntr ; ! "is told"
uapam:uapam TransAnimObj ; ! "see"
petu:pet%{A%} TransAnimObj ; ! "hear"
uitshi:uitshi TransAnimObj ; ! "help"
it:it TransAnimObj ; ! "say to"
nene:nene AnimIntr ; ! "breathe"
minuat:minua%{S%}%{h%} TransAnimObj ; ! "like"


LEXICON MiscRoot

ekᵘ%<ij%>:ekᵘ # ; ! "And then"
ekue%<cnjcoo%>:ekue # ; ! "then, consequently"
eukuan%<ij%>:eukuan # ; ! "Even though, anyway, I see"
eshe%<ij%>:eshe # ; ! "yes"
shash%<ij%>:shash # ; ! "That's all"
tanite%<cnjcoo%>:tanite # ; ! "because, since - is this coordinating or subordinating?
minuat%<cnjcoo%>:minuat # ; ! "ans then"


LEXICON PronounRoot

dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<prx%>%<sg%>:ue # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<prx%>%<pl%>:utshenat # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<med%>%<sg%>:ne # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<med%>%<sg%>:an # ; ! There is a slight difference in sense between ne and an
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<med%>%<pl%>:anitshenat # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<mdst%>%<sg%>:ne # ; ! Grammar seems inconsistent: ne or neme?
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<mdst%>%<pl%>:netshenat # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<dst%>%<sg%>:naui # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<dst%>%<sg%>:nahi # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<dst%>%<pl%>:nauitshenat # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<aa%>%<dst%>%<pl%>:nahitshenat # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nn%>%<prx%>%<sg%>:ume # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nn%>%<prx%>%<pl%>:umeni # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nn%>%<med%>%<sg%>:ne # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nn%>%<med%>%<pl%>:neni # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nn%>%<mdst%>%<sg%>:neme # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nn%>%<mdst%>%<pl%>:nemeni # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nn%>%<dst%>%<sg%>:naume # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nn%>%<dst%>%<pl%>:naumeni # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<prx%>:ute # ; ! "here"
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<med%>:anite # ; ! "there"
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<mdst%>:nete # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<dst%>:naute # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<foc%>%<sg%>:eukuan # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<foc%>%<aa%>%<pl%>:eukuanat # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<foc%>%<nn%>%<pl%>:eukuaneni # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<foc%>%<loc%>:ekuta # ;
dem%<prn%>%<dem%>%<foc%>%<loc%>:ekute # ;
prn%<prn%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:nin # ;
prn%<prn%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:tshin # ;
prn%<prn%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:uin # ;
prn%<prn%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<exc%>:ninan # ;
prn%<prn%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<inc%>:tshinan # ;
prn%<prn%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<inc%>:tshinanu # ;
prn%<prn%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:tshinuau # ;
prn%<prn%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:uinuau # ;
itg%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:tanite # ;


LEXICON AdvRoot

dem%<adv%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<prx%>:ute # ; ! "here"
dem%<adv%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<med%>:anite # ; ! "there"
dem%<adv%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<mdst%>:nete # ;
dem%<adv%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<dst%>:naute # ;
tapue%<adv%>:tapue # ; ! "really, truly"
mani%<adv%>:mani # ; ! "sometimes/occasionally, regularly"
shash%<adv%>:shash # ; ! "finally, already"
eka%<adv%>%<neg%>:eka # ; ! "not, don't" (subordinate clauses and imperatives)
apu%<adv%>%<neg%>:apu # ; ! "not" (independent clauses)
minuat%<adv%>:minuat # ; ! "again"
